Arkansas, session 2025, HB1665.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-57-604(a)(1)(B), concerning the credit
allowed against the premium tax based on the salary and wages of the
employees of the insurer, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read
as follows:
(iv) The credit shall not be applied as an offset
against the premium tax on collections reported as individual or group
comprehensive medical or hospital coverage.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-57-604(a)(2)(A) and (B), concerning the
credit allowed against the premium tax based on the salary and wages of the
employees of the insurer, are amended to read as follows:
*JLL264*
04-02-2025 10:38:49 JLL264

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 H4/2/25 HB1665
(2)(A) The offset shall not reduce the accident and health
premium tax due by more than the following amounts:
(i) For tax years beginning before January 1, 2021,
eighty percent (80%);
(ii) For the tax year beginning January 1, 2021,
seventy percent (70%);
(iii) For the tax year beginning January 1, 2022,
sixty percent (60%); and
(iv) For tax years beginning on and after January 1,
2023, fifty percent (50%).
(B) Beginning January 1, 2020, an An authorized accident
or health insurer shall not receive a credit under this subsection that
exceeds an annual total of eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000).

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 26-57-604(a)(4), concerning the credit
allowed against the premium tax based on the salary and wages of the
employees of the insurer, is amended to read as follows:
(4)(A)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(4)(B) of this
section, on or before March 1 of each year, any such authorized life or
accident and health insurer, including health maintenance organizations,
desiring to qualify under this provision shall furnish the appropriate data
and request on forms prescribed by the commissioner.
(ii) For purposes of calculating the taxes under §§
23-63-102 — 23-63-104, an insurer qualifying for a credit under this section
shall compute the tax due under §§ 23-63-102 — 23-63-104, if any, by using an
Arkansas premium tax rate of two and one-half percent (2½%).
(B)(i) Subdivision (a)(4)(A) of this section shall only
apply for tax years beginning prior to January 1, 2000.
(ii) By On or before March 1 of each year, an
authorized life or accident and health insurer, including health maintenance
organizations, desiring to qualify under this provision shall furnish the
appropriate data and request on forms prescribed by the commissioner.
(iii)(B) However, for purposes of calculating the
taxes under §§ 23-63-102 — 23-63-104, an insurer qualifying for a credit
under this section shall compute the tax due under §§ 23-63-102 — 23-63-104,
if any, by using an Arkansas premium tax rate of two and one-half percent
04-02-2025 10:38:49 JLL264

As Engrossed: H3/17/25 H4/2/25 HB1665
(2½%) without regard to the credit specified in this section.

/s/Wardlaw

































04-02-2025 10:38:49 JLL264